Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3150
Tax credit; estate or trust; amount.

(1) An estate or trust that makes one or more cash contributions to one or more eligible charitable organizations during a tax year shall be eligible for a credit against the income tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the amount of the credit shall be equal to the lesser of (a) the total amount of such contributions made during the tax year or (b) fifty percent of the income tax liability of such taxpayer for the tax year. A taxpayer may only claim a credit pursuant to this section for the portion of the contribution that was not claimed as a charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. Any credit not used by the estate or trust may be attributed to each beneficiary of the estate or trust in the same proportion used to report the beneficiary's income from the estate or trust for income tax purposes.

(2) The tax credit allowed under this section shall be a nonrefundable credit. Any amount of the tax credit that is unused may be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's income tax liability for the next five years immediately following the tax year in which the credit is first allowed. The tax credit cannot be carried back.

(3) The tax credit allowed under this section is subject to section 77-3152.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 30.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.